Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Long Term Care Ombudsman, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of  the General Fund, the following amounts for the
following purposes:
(1) General program and
services provided to
care facility residents ............... $ 8,578,071
(2) Public guardian and
conservator program ................ $ 7,609,208
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,345,139 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
and including federal Older Americans Act funds  received from the Department of Human
Services, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in this section, collected
or received by the Long Term Care Ombudsman.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled House Bill 5020 (HB 5020-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5020 (HB 5020-A) Page 2